Illinois, session 104th, HB5214.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act is 5amended by changing Section 6.5 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 5/6.5)7    Sec. 6.5. Clinical privileges; advanced practice 8registered nurses. All ambulatory surgical treatment centers 9(ASTC) licensed under this Act shall comply with the following 10requirements:11        (1) No ASTC policy, rule, regulation, or practice 12    shall be inconsistent with the provision of adequate 13    collaboration and consultation in accordance with Section 14    54.5 of the Medical Practice Act of 1987.15        (2) Operative surgical procedures shall be performed 16    only by a physician licensed to practice medicine in all 17    its branches under the Medical Practice Act of 1987, a 18    dentist licensed under the Illinois Dental Practice Act, 19    or a podiatric physician licensed under the Podiatric 20    Medical Practice Act of 1987, with medical staff 21    membership and surgical clinical privileges granted by the 22    consulting committee of the ASTC. A licensed physician, 23    dentist, or podiatric physician may be assisted by a   HB5214- 2 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1    physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 2    branches, dentist, dental assistant, podiatric physician, 3    licensed advanced practice registered nurse, licensed 4    physician assistant, licensed registered nurse, licensed 5    practical nurse, surgical assistant, surgical technician, 6    or other individuals granted clinical privileges to assist 7    in surgery by the consulting committee of the ASTC. 8    Payment for services rendered by an assistant in surgery 9    who is not an ambulatory surgical treatment center 10    employee shall be paid at the appropriate non-physician 11    modifier rate if the payor would have made payment had the 12    same services been provided by a physician.13        (2.5) A registered nurse licensed under the Nurse 14    Practice Act and qualified by training and experience in 15    operating room nursing shall be present in the operating 16    room and function as the circulating nurse during all 17    invasive or operative procedures. For purposes of this 18    paragraph (2.5), "circulating nurse" means a registered 19    nurse who is responsible for coordinating all nursing 20    care, patient safety needs, and the needs of the surgical 21    team in the operating room during an invasive or operative 22    procedure. 23        (3) An advanced practice registered nurse is not 24    required to possess prescriptive authority or a written 25    collaborative agreement meeting the requirements of the 26    Nurse Practice Act to provide advanced practice registered   HB5214- 3 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1    nursing services in an ambulatory surgical treatment 2    center. An advanced practice registered nurse must possess 3    clinical privileges granted by the consulting medical 4    staff committee and ambulatory surgical treatment center 5    in order to provide services. Individual advanced practice 6    registered nurses may also be granted clinical privileges 7    to order, select, and administer medications, including 8    controlled substances, to provide delineated care. The 9    attending physician must determine the advanced practice 10    registered nurse's role in providing care for his or her 11    patients, except as otherwise provided in the consulting 12    staff policies. The consulting medical staff committee 13    shall periodically review the services of advanced 14    practice registered nurses granted privileges. 15        (4) The anesthesia service shall be under the 16    direction of a physician licensed to practice medicine in 17    all its branches who has had specialized preparation or 18    experience in the area or who has completed a residency in 19    anesthesiology. An anesthesiologist, Board certified or 20    Board eligible, is recommended. Anesthesia services may 21    only be administered pursuant to the order of a physician 22    licensed to practice medicine in all its branches, 23    licensed dentist, or licensed podiatric physician.24            (A) The individuals who, with clinical privileges 25        granted by the medical staff and ASTC, may administer 26        anesthesia services are limited to the following:  HB5214- 4 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1                (i) an anesthesiologist; or2                (ii) a physician licensed to practice medicine 3            in all its branches; or4                (iii) a dentist with authority to administer 5            anesthesia under Section 8.1 of the Illinois 6            Dental Practice Act; or7                (iv) a licensed certified registered nurse 8            anesthetist; or9                (v) a podiatric physician licensed under the 10            Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987. 11            (B) For anesthesia services, an anesthesiologist 12        shall participate through discussion of and agreement 13        with the anesthesia plan and shall remain physically 14        present and be available on the premises during the 15        delivery of anesthesia services for diagnosis, 16        consultation, and treatment of emergency medical 17        conditions. In the absence of 24-hour availability of 18        anesthesiologists with clinical privileges, an 19        alternate policy (requiring participation, presence, 20        and availability of a physician licensed to practice 21        medicine in all its branches) shall be developed by 22        the medical staff consulting committee in consultation 23        with the anesthesia service and included in the 24        medical staff consulting committee policies.25            (C) A certified registered nurse anesthetist is 26        not required to possess prescriptive authority or a   HB5214- 5 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1        written collaborative agreement meeting the 2        requirements of Section 65-35 of the Nurse Practice 3        Act to provide anesthesia services ordered by a 4        licensed physician, dentist, or podiatric physician. 5        Licensed certified registered nurse anesthetists are 6        authorized to select, order, and administer drugs and 7        apply the appropriate medical devices in the provision 8        of anesthesia services under the anesthesia plan 9        agreed with by the anesthesiologist or, in the absence 10        of an available anesthesiologist with clinical 11        privileges, agreed with by the operating physician, 12        operating dentist, or operating podiatric physician in 13        accordance with the medical staff consulting committee 14        policies of a licensed ambulatory surgical treatment 15        center.16(Source: P.A. 99-642, eff. 7-28-16; 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.) 17    Section 10. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by 18changing Section 10.7 as follows: 19    (210 ILCS 85/10.7)20    Sec. 10.7. Clinical privileges; advanced practice 21registered nurses. All hospitals licensed under this Act 22shall comply with the following requirements:23        (1) No hospital policy, rule, regulation, or practice 24    shall be inconsistent with the provision of adequate   HB5214- 6 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1    collaboration and consultation in accordance with Section 2    54.5 of the Medical Practice Act of 1987.3        (2) Operative surgical procedures shall be performed 4    only by a physician licensed to practice medicine in all 5    its branches under the Medical Practice Act of 1987, a 6    dentist licensed under the Illinois Dental Practice Act, 7    or a podiatric physician licensed under the Podiatric 8    Medical Practice Act of 1987, with medical staff 9    membership and surgical clinical privileges granted at the 10    hospital. A licensed physician, dentist, or podiatric 11    physician may be assisted by a physician licensed to 12    practice medicine in all its branches, dentist, dental 13    assistant, podiatric physician, licensed advanced practice 14    registered nurse, licensed physician assistant, licensed 15    registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, surgical 16    assistant, surgical technician, or other individuals 17    granted clinical privileges to assist in surgery at the 18    hospital. Payment for services rendered by an assistant in 19    surgery who is not a hospital employee shall be paid at the 20    appropriate non-physician modifier rate if the payor would 21    have made payment had the same services been provided by a 22    physician.23        (2.5) A registered nurse licensed under the Nurse 24    Practice Act and qualified by training and experience in 25    operating room nursing shall be present in the operating 26    room and function as the circulating nurse during all   HB5214- 7 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1    invasive or operative procedures. For purposes of this 2    paragraph (2.5), "circulating nurse" means a registered 3    nurse who is responsible for coordinating all nursing 4    care, patient safety needs, and the needs of the surgical 5    team in the operating room during an invasive or operative 6    procedure. 7        (3) An advanced practice registered nurse is not 8    required to possess prescriptive authority or a written 9    collaborative agreement meeting the requirements of the 10    Nurse Practice Act to provide advanced practice registered 11    nursing services in a hospital. An advanced practice 12    registered nurse must possess clinical privileges 13    recommended by the medical staff and granted by the 14    hospital in order to provide services. Individual advanced 15    practice registered nurses may also be granted clinical 16    privileges to order, select, and administer medications, 17    including controlled substances, to provide delineated 18    care. The attending physician must determine the advanced 19    practice registered nurse's role in providing care for his 20    or her patients, except as otherwise provided in medical 21    staff bylaws. The medical staff shall periodically review 22    the services of advanced practice registered nurses 23    granted privileges. This review shall be conducted in 24    accordance with item (2) of subsection (a) of Section 10.8 25    of this Act for advanced practice registered nurses 26    employed by the hospital.   HB5214- 8 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1        (4) The anesthesia service shall be under the 2    direction of a physician licensed to practice medicine in 3    all its branches who has had specialized preparation or 4    experience in the area or who has completed a residency in 5    anesthesiology. An anesthesiologist, Board certified or 6    Board eligible, is recommended. Anesthesia services may 7    only be administered pursuant to the order of a physician 8    licensed to practice medicine in all its branches, 9    licensed dentist, or licensed podiatric physician.10            (A) The individuals who, with clinical privileges 11        granted at the hospital, may administer anesthesia 12        services are limited to the following:13                (i) an anesthesiologist; or14                (ii) a physician licensed to practice medicine 15            in all its branches; or16                (iii) a dentist with authority to administer 17            anesthesia under Section 8.1 of the Illinois 18            Dental Practice Act; or19                (iv) a licensed certified registered nurse 20            anesthetist; or21                (v) a podiatric physician licensed under the 22            Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987. 23            (B) For anesthesia services, an anesthesiologist 24        shall participate through discussion of and agreement 25        with the anesthesia plan and shall remain physically 26        present and be available on the premises during the   HB5214- 9 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1        delivery of anesthesia services for diagnosis, 2        consultation, and treatment of emergency medical 3        conditions. In the absence of 24-hour availability of 4        anesthesiologists with medical staff privileges, an 5        alternate policy (requiring participation, presence, 6        and availability of a physician licensed to practice 7        medicine in all its branches) shall be developed by 8        the medical staff and licensed hospital in 9        consultation with the anesthesia service.10            (C) A certified registered nurse anesthetist is 11        not required to possess prescriptive authority or a 12        written collaborative agreement meeting the 13        requirements of Section 65-35 of the Nurse Practice 14        Act to provide anesthesia services ordered by a 15        licensed physician, dentist, or podiatric physician. 16        Licensed certified registered nurse anesthetists are 17        authorized to select, order, and administer drugs and 18        apply the appropriate medical devices in the provision 19        of anesthesia services under the anesthesia plan 20        agreed with by the anesthesiologist or, in the absence 21        of an available anesthesiologist with clinical 22        privileges, agreed with by the operating physician, 23        operating dentist, or operating podiatric physician in 24        accordance with the hospital's alternative policy.25(Source: P.A. 99-642, eff. 7-28-16; 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.)   HB5214- 10 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1    Section 15. The Medical Practice Act of 1987 is amended by 2changing Section 54.5 as follows: 3    (225 ILCS 60/54.5)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)5    Sec. 54.5. Physician delegation of authority to physician 6assistants, advanced practice registered nurses without full 7practice authority, and prescribing psychologists. 8    (a) Physicians licensed to practice medicine in all its 9branches may delegate care and treatment responsibilities to a 10physician assistant under guidelines in accordance with the 11requirements of the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987. 12A physician licensed to practice medicine in all its branches 13may enter into collaborative agreements with no more than 7 14full-time equivalent physician assistants, except in a 15hospital, hospital affiliate, or ambulatory surgical treatment 16center as set forth by Section 7.7 of the Physician Assistant 17Practice Act of 1987 and as provided in subsection (a-5).18    (a-5) A physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 19branches may collaborate with more than 7 physician assistants 20when the services are provided in a federal primary care 21health professional shortage area with a Health Professional 22Shortage Area score greater than or equal to 12, as determined 23by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. 24    The collaborating physician must keep appropriate 25documentation of meeting this exemption and make it available   HB5214- 11 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1to the Department upon request.2    (b) A physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 3branches in active clinical practice may collaborate with an 4advanced practice registered nurse in accordance with the 5requirements of the Nurse Practice Act. Collaboration is for 6the purpose of providing medical consultation, and no 7employment relationship is required. A written collaborative 8agreement shall conform to the requirements of Section 65-35 9of the Nurse Practice Act. The written collaborative agreement 10shall be for services for which the collaborating physician 11can provide adequate collaboration. A written collaborative 12agreement shall be adequate with respect to collaboration with 13advanced practice registered nurses if all of the following 14apply:15        (1) The agreement is written to promote the exercise 16    of professional judgment by the advanced practice 17    registered nurse commensurate with his or her education 18    and experience.19        (2) The advanced practice registered nurse provides 20    services based upon a written collaborative agreement with 21    the collaborating physician, except as set forth in 22    subsection (b-5) of this Section. With respect to labor 23    and delivery, the collaborating physician must provide 24    delivery services in order to participate with a certified 25    nurse midwife.26        (3) Methods of communication are available with the   HB5214- 12 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1    collaborating physician in person or through 2    telecommunications for consultation, collaboration, and 3    referral as needed to address patient care needs.4    (b-5) An anesthesiologist or physician licensed to 5practice medicine in all its branches may collaborate with a 6certified registered nurse anesthetist in accordance with 7Section 65-35 of the Nurse Practice Act for the provision of 8anesthesia services. With respect to the provision of 9anesthesia services, the collaborating anesthesiologist or 10physician shall have training and experience in the delivery 11of anesthesia services consistent with Department rules. 12Collaboration shall be adequate if:13        (1) an anesthesiologist or a physician participates in 14    the joint formulation and joint approval of orders or 15    guidelines and periodically reviews such orders and the 16    services provided patients under such orders; and17        (2) for anesthesia services, the anesthesiologist or 18    physician participates through discussion of and agreement 19    with the anesthesia plan and is physically present and 20    available on the premises during the delivery of 21    anesthesia services for diagnosis, consultation, and 22    treatment of emergency medical conditions. Anesthesia 23    services in a hospital shall be conducted in accordance 24    with Section 10.7 of the Hospital Licensing Act and in an 25    ambulatory surgical treatment center in accordance with 26    Section 6.5 of the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center   HB5214- 13 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1    Act.2    (b-10) The anesthesiologist or operating physician must 3agree with the anesthesia plan prior to the delivery of 4services.5    (c) The collaborating physician shall have access to the 6medical records of all patients attended by a physician 7assistant. The collaborating physician shall have access to 8the medical records of all patients attended to by an advanced 9practice registered nurse.10    (d) (Blank).11    (e) A physician shall not be liable for the acts or 12omissions of a prescribing psychologist, physician assistant, 13or advanced practice registered nurse solely on the basis of 14having signed a supervision agreement or guidelines or a 15collaborative agreement, an order, a standing medical order, a 16standing delegation order, or other order or guideline 17authorizing a prescribing psychologist, physician assistant, 18or advanced practice registered nurse to perform acts, unless 19the physician has reason to believe the prescribing 20psychologist, physician assistant, or advanced practice 21registered nurse lacked the competency to perform the act or 22acts or commits willful and wanton misconduct.23    (f) A collaborating physician may, but is not required to, 24delegate prescriptive authority to an advanced practice 25registered nurse as part of a written collaborative agreement, 26and the delegation of prescriptive authority shall conform to   HB5214- 14 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1the requirements of Section 65-40 of the Nurse Practice Act. 2    (g) A collaborating physician may, but is not required to, 3delegate prescriptive authority to a physician assistant as 4part of a written collaborative agreement, and the delegation 5of prescriptive authority shall conform to the requirements of 6Section 7.5 of the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987. 7    (h) (Blank).8    (i) A collaborating physician shall delegate prescriptive 9authority to a prescribing psychologist as part of a written 10collaborative agreement, and the delegation of prescriptive 11authority shall conform to the requirements of Section 4.3 of 12the Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act. 13    (j) As set forth in Section 22.2 of this Act, a licensee 14under this Act may not directly or indirectly divide, share, 15or split any professional fee or other form of compensation 16for professional services with anyone in exchange for a 17referral or otherwise, other than as provided in Section 22.2. 18(Source: P.A. 103-228, eff. 1-1-24.) 19    Section 20. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by changing 20Section 65-45 as follows: 21    (225 ILCS 65/65-45)  (was 225 ILCS 65/15-25)22    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)23    Sec. 65-45. Advanced practice registered nursing in 24hospitals, hospital affiliates, or ambulatory surgical   HB5214- 15 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1treatment centers. 2    (a) An advanced practice registered nurse may provide 3services in a hospital or a hospital affiliate as those terms 4are defined in the Hospital Licensing Act or the University of 5Illinois Hospital Act or a licensed ambulatory surgical 6treatment center without a written collaborative agreement 7pursuant to Section 65-35 of this Act. An advanced practice 8registered nurse must possess clinical privileges recommended 9by the hospital medical staff and granted by the hospital or 10the consulting medical staff committee and ambulatory surgical 11treatment center in order to provide services. The medical 12staff or consulting medical staff committee shall periodically 13review the services of all advanced practice registered nurses 14granted clinical privileges, including any care provided in a 15hospital affiliate. Authority may also be granted when 16recommended by the hospital medical staff and granted by the 17hospital or recommended by the consulting medical staff 18committee and ambulatory surgical treatment center to 19individual advanced practice registered nurses to select, 20order, and administer medications, including controlled 21substances, to provide delineated care. In a hospital, 22hospital affiliate, or ambulatory surgical treatment center, 23the attending physician shall determine an advanced practice 24registered nurse's role in providing care for his or her 25patients, except as otherwise provided in the medical staff 26bylaws or consulting committee policies.   HB5214- 16 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1    (a-2) An advanced practice registered nurse privileged to 2order medications, including controlled substances, may 3complete discharge prescriptions provided the prescription is 4in the name of the advanced practice registered nurse and the 5attending or discharging physician.6    (a-3) Advanced practice registered nurses practicing in a 7hospital or an ambulatory surgical treatment center are not 8required to obtain a mid-level controlled substance license to 9order controlled substances under Section 303.05 of the 10Illinois Controlled Substances Act. 11    (a-4) An advanced practice registered nurse meeting the 12requirements of Section 65-43 may be privileged to complete 13discharge orders and prescriptions under the advanced practice 14registered nurse's name. 15    (a-5) For anesthesia services provided by a certified 16registered nurse anesthetist, an anesthesiologist, physician, 17dentist, or podiatric physician shall participate through 18discussion of and agreement with the anesthesia plan and shall 19remain physically present and be available on the premises 20during the delivery of anesthesia services for diagnosis, 21consultation, and treatment of emergency medical conditions, 22unless hospital policy adopted pursuant to clause (B) of 23subdivision (3) of Section 10.7 of the Hospital Licensing Act 24or ambulatory surgical treatment center policy adopted 25pursuant to clause (B) of subdivision (3) of Section 6.5 of the 26Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act provides otherwise. A   HB5214- 17 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1certified registered nurse anesthetist may select, order, and 2administer medication for anesthesia services under the 3anesthesia plan agreed to by the anesthesiologist or the 4physician, in accordance with hospital alternative policy or 5the medical staff consulting committee policies of a licensed 6ambulatory surgical treatment center.7    (b) An advanced practice registered nurse who provides 8services in a hospital shall do so in accordance with Section 910.7 of the Hospital Licensing Act and, in an ambulatory 10surgical treatment center, in accordance with Section 6.5 of 11the Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center Act. Nothing in this 12Act shall be construed to require an advanced practice 13registered nurse to have a collaborative agreement to practice 14in a hospital, hospital affiliate, or ambulatory surgical 15treatment center. 16    (c) Advanced practice registered nurses certified as nurse 17practitioners, nurse midwives, or clinical nurse specialists 18practicing in a hospital affiliate may be, but are not 19required to be, privileged to prescribe Schedule II through V 20controlled substances when such authority is recommended by 21the appropriate physician committee of the hospital affiliate 22and granted by the hospital affiliate. This authority may, but 23is not required to, include prescription of, selection of, 24orders for, administration of, storage of, acceptance of 25samples of, and dispensing over-the-counter medications, 26legend drugs, medical gases, and controlled substances   HB5214- 18 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1categorized as Schedule II through V controlled substances, as 2defined in Article II of the Illinois Controlled Substances 3Act, and other preparations, including, but not limited to, 4botanical and herbal remedies.5    To prescribe controlled substances under this subsection 6(c), an advanced practice registered nurse certified as a 7nurse practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical nurse 8specialist must obtain a controlled substance license. 9Medication orders shall be reviewed periodically by the 10appropriate hospital affiliate physicians committee or its 11physician designee.12    The hospital affiliate shall file with the Department 13notice of a grant of prescriptive authority consistent with 14this subsection (c) and termination of such a grant of 15authority, in accordance with rules of the Department. Upon 16receipt of this notice of grant of authority to prescribe any 17Schedule II through V controlled substances, the licensed 18advanced practice registered nurse certified as a nurse 19practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical nurse specialist may 20register for a mid-level practitioner controlled substance 21license under Section 303.05 of the Illinois Controlled 22Substances Act.23    In addition, a hospital affiliate may, but is not required 24to, privilege an advanced practice registered nurse certified 25as a nurse practitioner, nurse midwife, or clinical nurse 26specialist to prescribe any Schedule II controlled substances,   HB5214- 19 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1if all of the following conditions apply:2        (1) specific Schedule II controlled substances by oral 3    dosage or topical or transdermal application may be 4    designated, provided that the designated Schedule II 5    controlled substances are routinely prescribed by advanced 6    practice registered nurses in their area of certification; 7    the privileging documents must identify the specific 8    Schedule II controlled substances by either brand name or 9    generic name; privileges to prescribe or dispense Schedule 10    II controlled substances to be delivered by injection or 11    other route of administration may not be granted;12        (2) any privileges must be controlled substances 13    limited to the practice of the advanced practice 14    registered nurse;15        (3) any prescription must be limited to no more than a 16    30-day supply;17        (4) the advanced practice registered nurse must 18    discuss the condition of any patients for whom a 19    controlled substance is prescribed monthly with the 20    appropriate physician committee of the hospital affiliate 21    or its physician designee; and22        (5) the advanced practice registered nurse must meet 23    the education requirements of Section 303.05 of the 24    Illinois Controlled Substances Act. 25    (d) An advanced practice registered nurse meeting the 26requirements of Section 65-43 may be privileged to prescribe   HB5214- 20 -LRB104 17374 BAB 30799 b1controlled substances categorized as Schedule II through V in 2accordance with Section 65-43. 3(Source: P.A. 99-173, eff. 7-29-15; 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.)